Utah statutes.
48-3a-1108.   This part does not limit regulating board.

This part does not restrict the authority or duty of a regulating board to license an individual providing a professional service or the practice of the profession that is within the jurisdiction of the regulating board, notwithstanding that the individual:

(1)  is a member, manager, or employee of a professional services company; or

(2)  provides the professional service or engages in the practice of the profession through a professional services company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

